Utah statutes.
26-8a-305.   Ambulance license required for emergency medical transport.

Except as provided in Section 26-8a-308, only an ambulance operating under a permit issued under Section 26-8a-304 may transport an individual who:

(1)  is in an emergency medical condition;

(2)  is medically or mentally unstable, requiring direct medical observation during transport;

(3)  is physically incapacitated because of illness or injury and in need of immediate transport by emergency medical service personnel;

(4)  is likely to require medical attention during transport;

(5)  is being maintained on any type of emergency medical electronic monitoring;

(6)  is receiving or has recently received medications that could cause a sudden change in medical condition that might require emergency medical services;

(7)  requires IV administration or maintenance, oxygen that is not patient-operated, or other emergency medical services during transport;

(8)  needs to be immobilized during transport to a hospital, an emergency patient receiving facility, or mental health facility due to a mental or physical condition, unless the individual is in the custody of a peace officer and the primary purpose of the restraint is to prevent escape;

(9)  needs to be immobilized due to a fracture, possible fracture, or other medical condition; or

(10)  otherwise requires or has the potential to require a level of medical care that the committee establishes as requiring direct medical observation.



Enacted by Chapter 141, 1999 General Session

